Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
“Hold Harmless” Clauses

§ 31-5-41.
“Hold harmless” clauses in construction contracts are void; exceptions.

With respect to all public or private contracts or agreements, for the construction, alteration, repair or maintenance of buildings, structures, highway bridges, viaducts, water, sewer or gas distribution systems, or other work dealing with construction, or for any moving, demolition or excavation connected therewith, every covenant, promise and/or agreement contained therein to indemnify or hold harmless another person from that person’s own negligence is void as against public policy and wholly unenforceable.

This section does not apply to construction bonds or insurance contracts or agreements.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 278.9; Laws, 1972, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1972).